Utah statutes.
31A-14-101.   Purposes of chapter.

This chapter's purposes are to:

(1)  protect insureds, creditors, and the public by providing adequate standards and an orderly procedure for the authorization of foreign insurers;

(2)  subject foreign insurers doing an insurance business in Utah to the jurisdiction of the Utah commissioner and courts; and

(3)  provide Utah policyholders dealing with foreign insurers with regulatory protection equivalent to that provided to Utah policyholders dealing with domestic insurers.

